Wisconsin, session 2025, SB874.
do enact as follows:SB874,11Section 1. 23.405 of the statutes is created to read:SB874,2,3223.405 Report on environmental impacts to vulnerable communities. 3(1) In this section:SB874,2,74(a) “Cumulative impacts” means the combined past, present, and foreseeable 5future emissions and discharges occurring in a specific geographical area that are 6assessed based upon guidance issued by the department for exposure, public health 7or environmental risk, or other effects to the geographical area.SB874,2,98(b) “Facility” means any facility, the operation of which requires a permit 9issued by the department under ch. 283, 285, 289, or 291.SB874,2,1110(c) “Limited English proficiency” means a household without an adult that 11speaks English “very well” according to the U.S. bureau of the census.SB874,2,1412(d) “Low-income household” means a household with an income that is not 13more than 200 percent of the federal poverty level as determined annually by the 14U.S. bureau of the census.SB874,3,215(e) “Vulnerable community” means any census block group, as delineated in 1the most recent federal decennial census, in which at least 50 percent of the 2households qualify as low-income households and any of the following apply:SB874,3,531. Not less than 40 percent of the residents of the census block group identify 4as Black, African American, Asian American, Hispanic, or Latino or as members of 5a federally recognized Indian tribe or band located in this state.SB874,3,762. Not less than 40 percent of the households in the census block group have 7limited English proficiency.SB874,3,118(2) The department shall identify and maintain a list of vulnerable 9communities in the state. The department shall update the list as necessary to 10reflect the most recent data on household income and the most recent federal 11decennial census.SB874,3,1412(3) The department may not issue a permit under ch. 283, 285, 289, or 291 for 13the operation of a facility that is located wholly or partly within a vulnerable 14community unless the permit applicant does all of the following:SB874,3,1815(a) Prepares a report assessing the environmental impact of the facility, 16including any cumulative impacts on the vulnerable community, any adverse 17environmental effects that could not be avoided if the permit were issued, and the 18public health impact on the vulnerable community.SB874,3,2119(b) Makes the report under par. (a) available to the public and provides the 20report to the department and the governing body and municipal clerk for the 21municipality in which the vulnerable community is located.SB874,4,1022(c) Not less than 30 days after providing the report to the department and the 23governing body and municipal clerk under par. (b), conducts a public hearing in the 1municipality in which the vulnerable community is located. The permit applicant 2shall conduct the public hearing in a manner that provides clear, accurate, and 3complete information about the facility and that provides the opportunity for 4meaningful public participation by residents of the vulnerable community. Not less 5than 21 days prior to the hearing, the permit applicant shall publish public notices 6of the hearing in no fewer than 2 newspapers circulating within the vulnerable 7community. Not less than 14 days prior to the hearing, the permit applicant shall 8provide a copy of the public notice to the department and the governing body and 9the municipal clerk of the municipality in which the vulnerable community is 10located.SB874,4,1411(4) If a permit applicant is applying for more than one permit for a proposed 12new or expanded facility that is subject to sub. (3), the permit applicant is not 13required to comply with sub. (3) more than once for permits applicable to that 14facility.SB874,4,1915(5) Following a public hearing conducted under sub. (3) (c), the department 16shall consider community support and any testimony presented at the public 17hearing in its decision to grant or deny a permit and shall evaluate any revisions or 18conditions to the permit that may be necessary to reduce the adverse impact to 19public health or to the environment in the vulnerable community.SB874,5,420(6) The department shall issue a decision on a permit application that is 21subject to sub. (3) not less than 60 days following the public hearing held as 22required by sub. (3) (c). The department may deny an application for a permit for 23the operation of a facility that is located wholly or partly within a vulnerable 1community if the department finds that the cumulative impact of the facility, in 2addition to the existing conditions in the vulnerable community, constitute an 3unreasonable risk to the environment and the health of the residents in the 4vulnerable community.SB874,5,65(7) The department may promulgate any rules necessary to administer this 6section.SB874,27Section 2. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the first day of the 6th 8month beginning after publication, except as follows:SB874,5,109(1) The treatment of s. 23.405 (1) (c), (d), and (e) and (2) takes effect on first 10day of the 4th month beginning after publication.SB874,5,1111